not-to-release/fst/nci.lexd
PATTERNS
ADJ
ADV
CONJ
DET
NOUN
NUM
PRON
PROPN
PUNCT
VERB
PART

Irregulares

###############################################################################

PATTERN NOUN
# Absolutive Nouns
Noun-Absolutive
# Possessive singular
Possessives Noun-Possessed > N-DERIV
# Possessive plural
Possessives Noun-Possessed N-POSS-PL > N-DERIV-PL
# Derived Nouns
Comunes[-poss] [<n>:] N-DERIV
# Spanish Nouns
Possessives < SpaNounStem
# Locative Nouns
Possessives < Locativos [<n><loc>:] > N-POSS-PL > N-DERIV-PL
# Relational Nouns
Possessives Relacionales [<n><rel>:] > N-POSS-PL > N-DERIV-PL

PATTERN SpaNounStem
Comunes[spa] [<n>:] N-ABS-SPA[spa]
Comunes[spa-s] [<n>:] N-ABS-SPA[spa-s]
Comunes[spa-es] [<n>:] N-ABS-SPA[spa-es]
Comunes[spa-anes] [<n>:] N-ABS-SPA[spa-anes]

LEXICON Possessives
<px3aa>:te>
<px1sg>:no>
<px1sg>:no~no> # FIXME: Check
<px2sg>:mo>
<px3sg>:i>
<px1pl>:to>
<px2pl>:namo> # FIXME: Check
<px3pl>:in>

LEXICON N-ABS
<abs>:li[li]
<pl>:tin[li]
<abs>:tl[tl]
<pl>:me[tl]
<abs>:catl[catl]
<pl>:ca[catl]
<abs>:tli[tli]
<pl>:tin[tli]
<abs>:tl[huitl]
<abs>:[Ø]
<pl>:me[Ø]
<abs>:ni[ni]
<abs>:[eca]
<pl>:>uh[teteuh]
<pl>:tin[cicitlaltin]
<abs>:t[t]
<pl>:t>que[t]
<abs>:qui[qui]
<pl>:que[qui]

LEXICON N-ABS-SPA
:án[spa-anes]
<pl>:an>es[spa-anes]
:[spa-es]
<pl>:>es[spa-es]
:[spa-s]
<pl>:>s[spa-s]
:[spa]

PATTERN Noun-Absolutive
(Comunes[-spa,-spa-s,-spa-es,-spa-anes] [<n>:] N-ABS)[^[li,tl,tli,huitl,Ø,ni,eca,teteuh,cicitlaltin,catl,que,t]]

PATTERN Noun-Possessed
Comunes[-teteuh,-cicitlaltin,-spa,-spa-s,-spa-es,-spa-anes,-loc,-rel] [<n>:]

LEXICON N-DERIV 
<rev>:>tzin
<rev><pl>:>tzi~tzin
<dim>:>ton
<aug>:>pol

LEXICON N-POSS-PL
<pl>:>huan

LEXICON N-DERIV-PL
<rev>:>tzi~tzin

###############################################################################

PATTERN PROPN
Propios[loc] [<np><loc>:]
Propios[tl] NP-TL
Propios[-tl,-loc] [<np>:]

LEXICON NP-TL
<np>:tl
<np><rev>:>tzin

###############################################################################

PATTERN NUM
Digitos [<num>:]
Numeros[-tli,-li] [<num>:]
Numeros[tli] NUM-TLI
Numeros[li] NUM-LI

LEXICON Digitos 
/([0123456789])+[,.]([0123456789])+/

LEXICON NUM-TLI
<num>:>tli
<num><pl>:>tin
<num><cmp>:

LEXICON NUM-LI
<num>:>li
<num><cmp>:

###############################################################################

PATTERN ADJ
Adjetivos [<adj>:]

PATTERN ADV
Adverbios[itg] [<adv><itg>:]
Adverbios[-itg] [<adv>:]

###############################################################################

PATTERN PRON
Pron-Pers(1) [<short>:] :Pron-Pers(2)[-skip]
Pron-Pers(1) :Pron-Pers(3)[-skip]
Pron-Pers(1) Pron-Pers(4)[-skip]
Pron-Other

LEXICON Pron-Pers(4) # stem, short, normal, reverential/long
nehhuatl<prn><pers><p1><sg>:nehhua      > >tl      [skip]
tehhuatl<prn><pers><p2><sg>:tehhua      > >tl <rev>:>tzin
yehhuatl<prn><pers><p3><sg>:yehhua      > >tl      [skip]
tehhuan<prn><pers><p1><pl>:tehhuan [skip]   :      [skip]
yehhuan<prn><pers><p3><pl>:yehhuan [skip]   : <long>:>tin

LEXICON Pron-Other
tlein<prn><rel>:tlein
intla<prn>:intla
aca<prn>:aca
ayatle<prn>:ayatle

aquin<prn><ind>:aqui>n
aquin<prn><ind><pl>:aqui>que

###############################################################################

LEXICON CONJ

ipampa<cnjsub>:ipampa # "porque"
ihcuac<cnjsub>:ihcuac # "cuando"
in<cnjsub>:in # ""
inic<cnjsub>:inic # ""

auh<cnjcoo>:auh # "y"
y<cnjcoo>:y # "y"

ye<cnjsub>:ye
ca<cnjsub>:ca

LEXICON DET 

in<det>:in

LEXICON PART
ma<part><opt>:ma

LEXICON Numeros

ce:ce # "uno"
ome:ome # "dos"
eyi:eyi # "tres"
nahui:nahui # "cuatro"
macuilli:macuil[li] # "cinco"
chicuacen:chicuacen # "seis"
chicome:chicome # "siete"
chicueyi:chicueyi # "ocho"
chiconahui:chiconahui # "nueve"
matlactli:matlac[tli] # "diez"
caxtolli:caxtol[li] # "quince"
cempohualli:cempohual[li] # "veinte"

LEXICON Relacionales 

pan:pan # ""
pantzinco:pantzinco # ""
tech:tech # ""
techpa:techpa # ""
techtzinco:techtzinco # ""
huan:huan # ""
campa:campa # ""
huic:huic # ""
huicpa:huicpa # ""
copac:copac # ""
ixpan:ixpan # ""
ixpampa:ixpampa # ""
ixpantzinco:ixpantzinco # ""
tzintlan:tzintlan # ""
ca:ca # ""
tic:tic # ""
itic:itic # ""
icpac:icpac # ""
tzalan:tzalan # ""
icxitlan:icxitlan # ""
pampa:pampa # ""
mixpan:mixpan # "" 
ca:ca # ""
nanacaztlan:nanacaztlan # ""
nacazco:nacazco # ""
nepantla:nepantla # ""
#ten:ten # ""

#toca:toca # ""

LEXICON Locativos 

teopan:teopan # ""
tecpan:tecpan # ""
yaopan:yaopan # ""
milpan:milpan # ""
tlalpan:tlalpan # ""
tianquizco:tianquizco # ""
tianquizpan:tianquizpan # ""
atlan:atlan # ""
#ten:ten # ""

LEXICON Comunes 

tlacatl:tla[catl] # "hombre"
cihuatl:cihua[tl] # "mujer" # FIXME: This can take -h plural too (e.g. -Ø in FloCo)
ehecatl:eheca[tl] # "viento"
yollotl:yollo[tl] # "corazón"
ilhuicatl:ilhui[catl] # "heaven, sky"
tlatelolcatl:tlatelol[catl] # ""
tenochcatl:tenoch[catl] # ""
pochtecatl:pochte[catl] # ""
tlaxcaltecatl:tlaxcalte[catl] # ""
chichimecatl:chichime[catl] # ""

tlatocat:tlatoca[t] # ""
calpixqui:calpix[qui] # ""
teopixqui:teopix[qui] # ""

nacatl:naca[tl] # "carne"
teotl:teo[tl] # "díos"
teotl:tete[teteuh] # ""
tetl:te[tl] # "díos"
calli:cal[li] # "casa"
cuicacalli:cuicacal[li] # ""
teocalli:teocal[li] # ""
#pilli:pil[li] # "hijo" # FIXME: Possessive only?
pilli:pil[li] # ""
pilli:pi~pil[cicitlaltin] # ""
tlacualli:tlacual[li] # "comida"
amoxtli:amox[tli] # "libro"
cactli:cac[tli] # "zapato"
chantli:chan[tli] # "hogar"
coyotl:coyo[tl] # "coyote"
tlacoyotl:tlacoyo[tl] # ""
yaoyotl:yaoyo[tl] # ""
tecolotl:tecolo[tl] # "búho"
huexolotl:huexolo[tl] # ""
tototl:toto[tl] # "pájaro"
tezahuitl:tezahui[huitl] # ""
ilhuitl:ilhui[huitl] # ""
tlacatecolotl:tlacatecolo[tl] # ""
tlatocayotl:tlatocayo[tl] # ""
telpochtli:telpoch[tli] # ""
tentli:ten[tli] # ""

toca:toca[poss] # ""

acatliacapanecatl:acatliacapane[catl] # ""
acolhuacatl:acolhua[catl] # ""
acuechcozcatl:acuechcoz[catl] # ""
ahuacatl:ahua[catl] # ""
atenpanecatl:atenpane[catl] # ""
atepocatl:atepo[catl] # ""
atlauhcatl:atlauh[catl] # ""
atocpanecatl:atocpane[catl] # ""
atotonilcatl:atotonil[catl] # ""
axaxayacatl:axaxaya[catl] # ""
axocopanecatl:axocopane[catl] # ""
ayonanacatl:ayonana[catl] # ""
ayotzintepecatl:ayotzintepe[catl] # ""
azcapotzalcatl:azcapotzal[catl] # ""
aztacalcatl:aztacal[catl] # ""
cacatl:ca[catl] # ""
cemanahuacatl:cemanahua[catl] # ""
cenchinanpanecatl:cenchinanpane[catl] # ""
centlalhuacpanecatl:centlalhuacpane[catl] # ""
chalcatl:chal[catl] # ""
chalchiuhcozcatl:chalchiuhcoz[catl] # ""
chinampanecatl:chinampane[catl] # ""
chinanpanecatl:chinanpane[catl] # ""
cihuatecpanecatl:cihuatecpane[catl] # ""
coaixtlahuacatl:coaixtlahua[catl] # ""
coyoacatl:coyoa[catl] # ""
cozcatl:coz[catl] # ""
cuahuacatl:cuahua[catl] # ""
cuauhnahuacatl:cuauhnahua[catl] # ""
cuauhyacatl:cuauhya[catl] # ""
cuetlaxtecatl:cuetlaxte[catl] # ""
cuextecatl:cuexte[catl] # ""
ezhuahuacatl:ezhuahua[catl] # ""
huappanecatl:huappane[catl] # ""
icnotlacatl:icnotla[catl] # ""
itzcuincuitlapilcatl:itzcuincuitlapil[catl] # ""
ixilotepecatl:ixilotepe[catl] # ""
iyahuitacatl:iyahuita[catl] # ""
malacatl:mala[catl] # ""
maliacatl:malia[catl] # ""
matlatzincatl:matlatzin[catl] # ""
mazanacatl:mazana[catl] # ""
mexicatl:mexi[catl] # ""
ocuiltecatl:ocuilte[catl] # ""
omacatl:oma[catl] # ""
petlacalcatl:petlacal[catl] # ""
teocuitlachipolcozcatl:teocuitlachipolcoz[catl] # ""
teocuitlacozcatl:teocuitlacoz[catl] # ""
teocuitlamatemecatl:teocuitlamateme[catl] # ""
tepancatl:tepan[catl] # ""
tepanecatl:tepane[catl] # ""
tepecuacuilcatl:tepecuacuil[catl] # ""
tequixquinahuacatl:tequixquinahua[catl] # ""
tetzilacatl:tetzila[catl] # ""
teucalcacatl:teucalca[catl] # ""
tezcacohuacatl:tezcacohua[catl] # ""
tezcatl:tez[catl] # ""
tlacatecatl:tlacate[catl] # ""
tlachcotecatl:tlachcote[catl] # ""
tlachtemalacatl:tlachtemala[catl] # ""
tlacochcatl:tlacoch[catl] # ""
tlalalacatl:tlalala[catl] # ""
tlalhuacpanecatl:tlalhuacpane[catl] # ""
tlappanecatl:tlappane[catl] # ""
tlatocatl:tlato[catl] # ""
tochacatl:tocha[catl] # ""
tochpanecatl:tochpane[catl] # ""
tocuiltecatl:tocuilte[catl] # ""
tolnahuacatl:tolnahua[catl] # ""
toltecatl:tolte[catl] # ""
tziuhcoacatl:tziuhcoa[catl] # ""
xaxalmalacatl:xaxalmala[catl] # ""
xayacatl:xaya[catl] # ""
xilotepecatl:xilotepe[catl] # ""
xonacatl:xona[catl] # ""
yahuitacatl:yahuita[catl] # ""

tlamantli:tlaman[tli] # ""
tlazotli:tlazo[tli] # ""
tecuhtli:tecuh[tli] # ""
tlahuiztli:tlahuiz[tli] # ""
cocoliztli:cocoliz[tli] # ""
tlachiuhtli:tlachiuh[tli] # ""
teocuitlanacochtli:teocuitlanacoch[tli] # ""
teuhtli:teuh[tli] # ""
ohtli:oh[tli] # ""
teponaztli:teponaz[tli] # ""
huetli:hue[tli] # ""
huauhtli:huauh[tli] # ""
cuachtli:cuach[tli] # ""
tlexochtli:tlexoch[tli] # ""
tlanamactli:tlanamac[tli] # ""
tlamacehualiztli:tlamacehualiz[tli] # ""
